Washington statutes.
RCW 10.79.050

Restoration of stolen property to owner—Duties of officers.

All property obtained by larceny, robbery or burglary, shall be restored to the owner; and no sale, whether in good faith on the part of the purchaser or not, shall divest the owner of his or her rights to such property; and it shall be the duty of the officer who shall arrest any person charged as principal or accessory in any robbery or larceny, to secure the property alleged to have been stolen, and he or she shall be answerable for the same, and shall annex a schedule thereof to his or her return of the warrant.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1063; Code 1881 s 851; 1873 p 192 s 57; 1854 p 84 s 51; RRS s 2129.]